Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1630
Repealed. Laws 2026, LB803, § 29. Operative date January 1, 2027. Property Tax Request Act, how cited.

Sections 77-1630 to 77-1634 shall be known and may be cited as the Property Tax Request Act.

Laws 2021, LB644, § 1.